District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-1104

Taxes and assessments — Delinquency sale — Invalidity.

Repealed.

History

Feb. 28, 1933, 47 Stat. 1348, ch. 130, § 4
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 2002(i), 48 DCR 6981

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-1104.
1973 Ed., § 47-904.

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 2(i) of Real Property Tax Assessment Transition Temporary Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-23, September 6, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 9093).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 2(i) of Real Property Tax Assessment Transition Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-44, April 18, 2001, 48 DCR 3844).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 2(i) of Real Property Tax Assessment Transition Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-116, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7659).